Illinois, session 104th, HB3369.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Aeronautics Act is amended by 5adding Section 78.1 as follows: 6    (620 ILCS 5/78.1 new)7    Sec. 78.1. Assistance for individuals with disabilities.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Assistive device" means any piece of equipment that 10assists an individual with a disability to cope with the 11effects of his or her disability. 12    "Carrier" means a person who undertakes, directly or 13indirectly, or by a lease or any other arrangement, to engage 14in air transportation in this State.15    "Dignified" means conduct that respects passenger 16independence, autonomy, and privacy.17    "Hands-on training" means in-person training that provides 18an employee or contractor the opportunity to learn and 19practice real-life scenarios in a safe and controlled 20environment without the possibility of real-life consequences 21to individuals with disabilities and with the use of a 22suitable life-sized model or equipment, as appropriate.23    "Indirect carrier" means a person not directly involved in   HB3369- 2 -LRB104 06397 LNS 16433 b1the operation of an aircraft who sells air transportation 2services to the general public other than as an authorized 3agent of a carrier in this State.4    "Individual with a disability" or "Individual" means any 5individual who (i) has a physical or mental impairment that, 6on a permanent or temporary basis, substantially limits one or 7more major life activities, and (ii) has a record of such an 8impairment or is regarded as having such an impairment.9    "Mishandled" means lost, delayed, damaged, or pilfered.10    "Safe" means conduct that avoids the risk of bodily injury 11and ensures the proper handling of assistive devices.12    (b) A carrier or an indirect carrier shall provide 13assistance to an individual with a disability in a safe, 14dignified, and prompt manner. Whether assistance is prompt 15shall depend on the totality of the circumstances, except as 16provided in subsection (c).17    (c) Carriers shall provide or ensure the provision of 18timely assistance requested by or on behalf of an individual 19with a disability, or offered by carrier or airport operator 20personnel and accepted by an individual with a disability, in 21enplaning and deplaning. This assistance shall include, as 22needed, the services of personnel and the use of ground 23wheelchairs, accessible motorized carts, boarding wheelchairs, 24on-board wheelchairs, ramps, and mechanical lifts. When 25deplaning, prompt assistance must be provided to an individual 26with a disability who uses an aisle chair, including the   HB3369- 3 -LRB104 06397 LNS 16433 b1following:2        (1) Personnel and a boarding chair to aid in deplaning 3    the individual shall be available when the last passenger 4    who did not request deplaning assistance departs the 5    aircraft.6        (2) The individual's personal wheelchair shall be 7    available as close as possible to the door of the 8    aircraft, except where this practice would be inconsistent 9    with federal regulations governing transportation security 10    or the transportation of hazardous materials or when the 11    individual requests the wheelchair be returned at a 12    location other than the door of the aircraft. If the 13    individual requests the wheelchair be returned at a 14    location other than the door of the aircraft, an airport 15    wheelchair shall be available as close as possible to the 16    door of the aircraft for the individual's use.17    (d) Carriers shall provide timely notification to an 18individual with a disability when the individual's wheelchair 19or scooter has been loaded and stowed in the cargo compartment 20and unloaded and retrieved from the cargo compartment. If an 21individual's wheelchair or scooter does not fit into the cargo 22compartment, the carrier shall immediately notify the 23individual.24    (e) If an individual's wheelchair or scooter is 25mishandled, the carrier shall immediately notify the 26individual of his or her rights to the following:  HB3369- 4 -LRB104 06397 LNS 16433 b1        (1) to file a claim with the carrier;2        (2) to receive a loaner wheelchair or scooter from the 3    carrier;4        (3) to choose a preferred vendor for repairs or 5    replacement of the wheelchair or scooter;6        (4) to have a Complaints Resolution Official 7    available; and8        (5) to be provided information on how to contact the 9    Complaints Resolution Official.10    (f) The mishandling of an individual's checked wheelchair 11or other assistive device is a violation of the Air Carrier 12Access Act and this Section. A carrier shall assume liability 13for the mishandling of an individual's assistive device unless 14the carrier can demonstrate that the circumstances that led to 15the mishandling of the assistive device were outside of the 16carrier's control.17    (g) If an individual's checked wheelchair or scooter has 18been delayed, a carrier shall:19        (1) ensure that the wheelchair or scooter is 20    transported to the individual's final destination within 21    24 hours of the individual's arrival by whatever means 22    possible; and23        (2) provide the individual with a choice between 24    picking up the wheelchair or scooter at the individual's 25    final destination airport or having the wheelchair or 26    scooter delivered to another location upon a reasonable   HB3369- 5 -LRB104 06397 LNS 16433 b1    request by the individual. The wheelchair or scooter shall 2    be considered to be provided to the individual when either 3    (i) the wheelchair or scooter is transported to a location 4    requested by the individual, regardless of whether the 5    individual is present to take possession of the wheelchair 6    or scooter, or (ii) when the wheelchair or scooter has 7    arrived at the final destination airport, is available for 8    pickup, and the carrier has provided notice to the 9    individual of the location and availability of the 10    wheelchair or scooter for pickup.11    (h) If an individual's checked wheelchair or scooter has 12been lost, damaged, or pilfered, a carrier shall give the 13individual the following options:14        (1) The individual may file a claim with the carrier 15    and elect for the carrier to handle the repair or 16    replacement of the wheelchair or scooter. The carrier 17    shall then repair or replace the wheelchair or scooter 18    with a device of equivalent or greater function and safety 19    within a reasonable time frame and pay the cost of repairs 20    or replacement; or21        (2) The individual may file a claim with the carrier 22    and elect to use the individual's preferred vendor to 23    repair or replace the wheelchair or scooter. The carrier 24    shall then be responsible for promptly transporting the 25    damaged wheelchair or scooter to the individual's 26    preferred vendor, unless the individual has indicated that   HB3369- 6 -LRB104 06397 LNS 16433 b1    he or she will arrange for the transport himself or 2    herself, and for paying the cost of transport and repairs 3    or replacement with a device of equivalent or greater 4    function and safety within a reasonable time period.5    (i) If an individual is waiting for his or her mishandled 6personal wheelchair or scooter to be returned, repaired, or 7replaced, a carrier shall use its best efforts to work with the 8individual to provide an adequate loaner wheelchair or scooter 9that meets the individual's functional and safety-related 10needs. The carrier shall pay for the cost of the loaner 11wheelchair or scooter.12    (j) When conducting training for personnel, a carrier that 13operates aircraft with 19 or more passenger seats shall ensure 14that the training meets the requirements of this subsection 15(j) for all personnel who interact with the traveling public 16or who handle individuals' assistive devices, as appropriate 17to the duties of each employee or contractor. The training 18shall include:19        (1) Instruction that provides proficiency in the 20    requirements of applicable federal regulations affecting 21    the provision of air travel to an individual with a 22    disability;23        (2) Instruction that provides proficiency in 24    procedures concerning the provision of air travel to an 25    individual with a disability, including the proper and 26    safe operation of any equipment used to accommodate the   HB3369- 7 -LRB104 06397 LNS 16433 b1    individual with a disability;2        (3) Instruction that provides proficiency in 3    procedures that safeguard the safety and dignity of an 4    individual with a disability during the performance of the 5    services required under this Section;6        (4) Instruction that ensures that employees and 7    contractors who interact with the traveling public are 8    trained in different types of disabilities, including how 9    to distinguish among the differing abilities of 10    individuals with disabilities. This instruction shall 11    include the following topics:12            (A) the appropriate ways to communicate and 13        interact with individuals with disabilities, including 14        individuals with physical, sensory, mental, or 15        emotional disabilities; and16            (B) how to recognize requests for communication 17        accommodations from deaf-blind passengers and 18        individuals whose hearing or vision is impaired and 19        how to use the most common methods for communicating 20        with such individuals.21        (5) Instruction that ensures that employees and 22    contractors who provide physical assistance to an 23    individual with a disability who uses a wheelchair or 24    other assistive device are provided the following:25            (A) Hands-on training concerning safe and 26        dignified physical assistance, including:  HB3369- 8 -LRB104 06397 LNS 16433 b1                (i) transfers to and from personal or airport 2            wheelchairs, aisle chairs, and aircraft seats;3                (ii) proper lifting techniques to safeguard 4            passengers;5                (iii) how to troubleshoot common challenges in 6            providing physical assistance; and7                (iv) the proper use of equipment in physically 8            assisting an individual with a disability; and9            (B) Training concerning the collecting and sharing 10        of passenger information, such as Special Service 11        Request codes, that is needed to ensure safe, 12        dignified, and prompt physical assistance to the 13        individual.14        (6) Instruction that ensures that employees and 15    contractors who handle an individual's wheelchair or other 16    assistive device are provided with the following:17            (A) Hands-on training concerning the following:18                (i) common types of wheelchairs and other 19            assistive devices and features of each device;20                (ii) airport and airline equipment used to 21            load and unload wheelchairs and other assistive 22            devices; and23                (iii) methods for safely moving and stowing 24            wheelchairs, including lifting techniques and 25            methods for disassembly, reconfiguration, 26            reassembly, and securement in the cargo   HB3369- 9 -LRB104 06397 LNS 16433 b1            compartment of the aircraft; and2            (B) Training concerning the collecting and sharing 3        of information regarding an individual's wheelchair or 4        other assistive device, including the use of any 5        airline wheelchair handling forms that may exist, to 6        ensure the safe and proper handling of such assistive 7        devices.8    (k) The employees designated as Complaints Resolution 9Officials must receive training concerning the requirements of 10this Section and the duties of a Complaints Resolution 11Official prior to assuming his or her duties and at least once 12every 12 months thereafter.